Utah statutes.
41-22-11.   Agencies authorized to erect regulatory signs on public land.

No person, except an agent of an appropriate federal, state, county, or city agency, operating within that agency's authority, may place a regulatory sign governing off-highway vehicle use on any public land.



Amended by Chapter 1, 1986 Special Session 2

